Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-937
Notice of release; mental health board; hearing; tribal court.

(1) A mental health board shall be notified in writing of the release by the treatment facility of any individual committed by the mental health board. Such notice shall immediately be forwarded to the county attorney. The mental health board shall, upon the motion of the county attorney, or may upon its own motion, conduct a hearing to determine whether the individual is mentally ill and dangerous and consequently not a proper subject for release. Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures established for hearings under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act. The subject of such hearing shall be accorded all rights guaranteed to the subject of a petition under the act.

(2) In the case of a subject who is domiciled in Indian country and committed for treatment as provided in section 71-964, the tribal court shall be notified in writing of the release by the treatment facility of any such subject committed by the tribal court.

Laws 1981, LB 95, § 26;

Laws 2003, LB 724, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,2003, § 83-1079;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 57;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 20.